Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
302A

EDUCATION

Part I. General Provisions

Section

A. Miscellaneous

302A-101 Definitions

302A-102 Smoking prohibited; exception

B. Board of Education

302A-121 Board of education; members; student and
military

representatives

302A-122 Board of education; eligibility

302A-123 Board of education; terms

302A-124 Board of education; organization;
quorum; meetings

302A-125 Board of education; vacancies

302A-126 Board of education; qualifications;
administration

priorities

302A-127 Board of education; senate advice and
consent

Part II. Provisions Affecting Students

A. Student Performance Standards

302A-201 Statewide performance standards

302A-202 Repealed

B. Curriculum and Instruction

302A-251 School year; student hours

302A-301 Repealed

302A-305 Education research and development
revolving fund

302A-321 Standards-based curriculum

C. Supplementary Programs

302A-401 Dual credit program

302A-401.5 Repealed

302A-402, 403 Repealed

302A-404 School meals

302A-405 School cafeterias; funds; expenditures

302A-406 Transportation of school children

302A-407 School bus contracts

302A-407.5 School bus fare revolving fund

302A-408 After-school and weekend programs

302A-409, 410 Repealed

302A-411 Kindergarten program; establishment;
attendance

302A-412 Blind or visually handicapped
concessionaires

302A-413 Driver education

302A-414 Courses for instructors in driver
education

302A-415 Motor vehicles for driving instruction;
purchase

and sale

302A-416 Driver education fee

302A-417 Traffic safety education

302A-418, 419 Repealed

302A-420 Profits to pupils

302A-421 to 423 Repealed

302A-424 Regulation of other schools and classes

302A-425 License required for private trade,
vocational,

or technical school

302A-426 Suspension and revocation of license;
procedure

302A-427 Powers of department

302A-428 Penalty

302A-429 Repealed

302A-430 Coverage for workers' compensation

302A-431 Rules; reporting

302A-431.5 to 431.8 Repealed

302A-431.9 Veterans high school diploma for armed
services

veterans and others

302A-432 Adult and community education
authorized

302A-433 Scope of adult and community education
programs

offered

302A-434 Advisory council for adult and community

education

302A-435 Financing adult and community education
program

302A-436 Departmental duty toward exceptional
children

302A-437 Repealed

302A-438 Facilities, service, when required

302A-439 Eligibility standards

302A-440 Coverage for workers' compensation of
an

exceptional child

302A-441 Studies, surveys, rules

302A-442 Occupational therapy services, physical
therapy

services, school health services,
mental health

services, psychological services, and
medical

services for diagnostic or evaluative
purposes

302A-442.5 Instructional materials; exceptional
children

302A-443 Administrative hearing procedures and
subpoena

power relating to the education of
children

with a disability

302A-443.5 Education of students with
disabilities; private

residential facilities; special
education schools

or programs; accreditation

302A-444 to 446 Repealed

302A-447 State student council

D. Gender Equity in Sports

302A-461 Gender equity in athletics

302A-462 to 467 Repealed

E. School-to-Work--Repealed

302A-471 to 475 Repealed

F. Full Participation in School Act

302A-481 Definitions

302A-482 Affidavit for caregiver consent

302A-483 Penalties

302A-484 Transfer by the department of education

G. Adult Special Education
Transfer of Rights for

Students with Disabilities Upon
Reaching the

Age of Majority

302A-491 Power of attorney for special education

302A-492 Revocation of the power of attorney for
special

education

302A-493 Appointment of an educational
representative;

conditions

302A-494 Reconsideration of the need for an
educational

representative

302A-495 Decisions by guardian

302A-496 Duties and roles of the agent and
educational

representative

302A-497 Educational information

302A-498 Effect of copy

Part III. Provisions Affecting School
Personnel

A. Specific Definitions

302A-501 Definitions

B. Employment Conditions and
Compensation

302A-601 Repealed

302A‑601.3 Repealed

302A-601.5 Employees of the department of
education and

teacher trainees in any public school;
criminal

history record checks

302A-602 Teachers; licenses and certificates

302A-602.5 Certificates; revocation

302A-603 Teaching without certificates or
licenses;

penalty

302A-604 Complex area superintendents

302A-604.5 Repealed

302A-605 Principals and vice-principals

302A-606, 607 Repealed

302A-608 Reemployed teachers; rights

302A-609 Causes for discharge or demotion; preferred

eligibility list

302A-610 Job-sharing

302A-611 Authorized leaves of absence; tenure
status

unaffected

302A-612 School teachers afflicted with
tuberculosis

302A-613 Exchange teachers and educational
officers; terms

of contract

302A-614 Sabbatical leaves authorized

302A-615 Pay while on sabbatical

302A-616 Conditions of sabbatical leave of
absence

302A-617 Repealed

302A-618 Classification, teachers

302A-619 Classification, educational officers

302A-620 Classification/compensation appeals
board;

adjustments to
classification/compensation plan

302A-621 Salary; deputy superintendent,
assistant

superintendents, complex area
superintendents

302A-622 Repealed

302A-623 Salary ranges, educational officers

302A-624 Teachers' salary schedule

302A-625 Educational officers' salary schedules

302A-626 Salary increases; annual, longevity

302A-627 Salary ratings of entering or reentering

teachers; credit for military service

302A-628 Change in classification

302A-629 Educational officers; demotion,
transfers

302A-630 Teachers; additional benefits or
credits

302A-631 Educational officers with special
assignments;

principals and vice-principals at
special needs

schools

302A-632 Additional benefits to certain school
personnel

and teachers

302A-633 Repealed

302A-633.5 Repealed

302A-633.6 Allocations for coaches

302A-634, 635 Repealed

302A-636 Cafeteria managers

302A-637 Cafeteria workers

302A-638 Evaluation of teachers and educational
officers

302A-638.5 Repealed

302A-639 Houseparents; statewide center for
students with

hearing and visual impairments

302A-640 Repealed

302A-641 Meal count assistants, adult
supervisors, and

classroom cleaners; minimum wage

C. Staff Development and Incentives

302A-701 Incentive packages for quality
teachers,

principals, and vice-principals

302A-702 Candidates for certification

302A-703 Educational officers, salary incentives

302A-704 Tuition assistance for exemplary
teachers to

attend the University of Hawaii

302A-705 Repealed

302A-706 Teacher national board certification

incentive program

302A-707 Felix stipend program special fund

302A-708 Career development opportunities

D. Hawaii Teacher Standards Board

302A-801 Hawaii teacher standards board
established

302A-802 Licensing standards; policies

302A-803 Powers and duties of the board

302A-804 Powers and duties of the department,
commission,

and charter schools

302A-805 Teachers; license required; renewals

302A-805.5 Approval of teacher education programs;

professional development of teachers

302A-805.6 Efforts related to teacher quality

302A-806 Hawaii teacher standards board special
fund

302A-807 Refusal, suspension, revocation, and

reinstatement of licenses

302A-808 Penalty

302A-809 Repealed

E. Teachers' Housing

302A-831 Repealed

302A-832 Teachers' housing program;
administration

302A-833 Teachers' housing revolving fund

302A-834 Annual statements

302A-835 Annual review; disposal of units

F. School Health Services Program

302A-851 Purpose; establishment of program

302A-852 Teenage health program

302A-853 Administration of medication

302A-854 School health aides; compensation

302A-855 Repealed

Part IV. Provisions Affecting System
Structure

A. Specific Definitions

302A-901 Specific definitions

B. Accountability

302A-1001 Student bias

302A-1002 Reporting of crime-related incidents

302A-1003 Indemnity upon reporting

302A-1004 Educational accountability system;
annual

reports

302A-1005 Reconstituting schools

C. Organization

302A-1101 Department of education; board of
education;

superintendent of education

302A-1102 Department of education; statewide

administrative services

302A-1193 to 1106 Repealed

302A-1105, 1106 Repealed

302A-1106.5 Board of education; community meetings

302A-1107 to 1109 Repealed

302A-1110 Educational districts not applicable

302A-1111 Duties of superintendent

302A-1112 Rules

302A-1113 Seal

302A-1114 Power of appointment, removal

302A-1115 Repealed

302A-1116 Authority to create temporary positions

302A-1117 Records, evidence

302A-1118 Publications by department

302A-1119 Repealed

302A-1120 Public library system; board control

302A-1121 Repealed

302A-1122 Gifts

302A-1123 to 1123.6 Repealed

302A-1124 Mandate to initiate school community
councils

302A-1125 Educational objectives

302A-1126 Waiver of policy, rule, or procedures

302A-1127 Repealed

302A-1128 Department powers and duties

302A-1129 Schools; opening and closing

302A-1130 Public schools special fees and charges

302A-1130.5 Repealed

302A-1130.6 Textbook and instructional materials
fee

special account

302A-1131 Repealed

302A-1132 Attendance compulsory; exceptions

302A-1133 Emergency measures

302A-1133.5 Parent and guardian accountability for
compliance

with student code of conduct

302A-1134 Exclusion from school

302A-1134.5 Repealed

302A-1134.6 Zero tolerance policy

302A-1135 Penalty

302A-1136 Enforcement

302A-1137 Attendance records; availability to
authorized

police officers

302A-1138 Permit to leave grounds

302A-1139 Religious education

302A-1140 Religious holy days

302A-1141 Punishment of pupils limited

302A-1141.3 Use of seclusion, chemical restraint,
or mechanical

restraint prohibited

302A-1141.4 Use of physical restraint limited;
notification;

policies and procedures; training;
review

302A-1142 Repealed

302A-1143 Attending school in what service area

302A-1144 Repealed

302A-1145 Transfer to another school

302A-1146 Repealed

302A-1147 Use of school grounds by county
recreation

departments

302A-1148 Use of school facilities and grounds

302A-1148.5 Use of school grounds; assumption of
risk

302A-1149 Use of school facilities for after
school child

care

302A-1149.5 After-school plus program revolving
fund

302A-1150 Repealed

302A-1151 Sale of school lands unnecessary for
school

purposes

302A-1151.1 Pilot program for lease of public school land

302A-1151.2 School facilities subaccount

302A-1151.5 Use of vacant public school
facilities

302A-1151.6 Parking; control by department

302A-1152 Unauthorized vehicles on school or
public library

grounds

302A-1153 Vandalism damage to public school
property

302A-1154 Immunization upon attending school;
tuberculosis

clearance

302A-1155 Provisional attendance at school

302A-1156 Exemptions

302A-1157 Exemptions from immunization; not
recognized;

epidemic conditions

302A-1158 Immunization of indigent children

302A-1159 Physical examination required

302A-1160 Student's health record

302A-1161 Notification for noncompliance

302A-1162 Rules

302A-1163 Enforcement

302A-1164 Self-administration of medication by
student

and emergency administration;
self-testing and

self-management of diabetes by student;
assistance

with diabetes testing; permitted

D. New Century Charter
Schools--Repealed

302A-1181 to 1192 Repealed

Part V. Provisions Affecting Financial
Structure

A. Specific Definitions--Repealed

302A-1201 Repealed

B. Budget

302A-1301 School system financial accountability

302A-1302, 1303 Repealed

302A-1303.5 Committee on weights

302A-1303.6 Weighted student formula

302A-1304 Repealed

302A-1305 Inactive student activity accounts

302A-1306, 1307 Repealed

302A-1308 Repealed

302A-1309 Repealed

302A-1310 Out-of-school time instructional
programs; funds,

expenditures

302A-1311 Appropriations for trust funds of the
department

of education

302A-1312 Six-year program and financial plan for
school

repair and maintenance

302A-1313, 1315 Repealed

302A-1314 Hawaii 3Ts school technology
laboratories fund

C. Federal Funding

302A-1401 Administration and use of federal funds

302A-1402 Custodian of federal funds

302A-1403 Authority to secure federal funds

302A-1404 Federal impact aid military liaison

302A-1405 Federal grants revolving fund

302A-1406 Department of education federal revenue

maximization program revolving fund;
established

Part VI. Provisions Affecting Facilities

A. Facilities and Equipment

302A-1501 to 1502 Repealed

302A-1502.4 Hawaii 3R's school improvement fund

302A-1502.5 Repealed

302A-1502.6 Repealed

302A-1503 Donated school equipment and fixtures;
repair and

maintenance responsibility

302A-1504 Repealed

302A-1504.5 School-level minor repairs and
maintenance

special fund; reporting of carry over
funds

302A-1505 Repealed

302A-1506 Public school facilities

302A-1506.5 Repealed

302A-1507 Classroom cleaning project; established

302A-1508 Education design and construction
project

assessment fund

302A-1509 Environmentally-sensitive cleaning and
maintenance

products for use in public schools

B. School Impact Fees

302A-1601 Findings

302A-1602 Definitions

302A-1603 Applicability and exemptions

302A-1604 Designation of school impact districts

302A-1605 Impact fee analysis

302A-1606 Land component impact fee; determining
the

amount of land or fee in lieu

302A-1607 Construction cost component impact fee;

determining the amount of the fee

302A-1608 Accounting and expenditure requirements

302A-1609 Refunds of fees

302A-1610 Credits for land dedication

302A-1611 Credits for excess contributions or
advance

payment of required construction cost
component

impact fees

302A-1612 Use of data reflecting recent
conditions in

impact fee calculations

Part VII. Secondary School Students
Conference

302A-1801 Purpose

302A-1802 Student conference committee

302A-1803 Duties of the student conference
committee

302A-1804 Student conference advisory committee

302A-1805 Annual conference

Note

Pacific-Asia institute for resilience and sustainability. L
2014, c 229.

Bullying, cyberbullying, and harassment; compliance reports
to board. L 2011, c 214.

Establishing E academies. L 1999, c 178, §17.

Human resource management model for Waianae complex schools
(pilot project). L 2007, c 268.

Non-school hour programs for children and youth, annual
report by office of youth services. L 2006, c 281.

Pilot program for lease of public school land; reports to
legislature until completion of projects. L 2013, c 155, §4.

Professional development schools grant program. L 2001, c
313.

Science and technology plan incorporating EPSCor (experimental
program to stimulate competitive research) efforts (reports from 2011 and every
5 years thereafter). L 2009, c 137.

Single school calendar. L 2004, c 51, §49; L 2011, c 24.

Skilled worker and business development center at each
community college. L Sp 2009, c 34.

Substance abuse treatment programs in schools with greatest
need. L 2006, c 268.

Transition plan to end the use of multi-track schedules in
public schools; report to 2016 legislature. L 2015, c 116.

Use of restraint in public schools; reports to 2015-2016
legislature; update prior to 2017 legislative session. L 2014, c 206, §§4, 5.

This chapter, enacted by L 1996, c 89, is based on repealed
chapters 296, 296C, 296D, 297, 297D, 298, 299, 300, and 301. As appropriate,
amendments made to the repealed chapters by cc 48, 90, 91, 122, 123, 160, 162,
265, and 298 of the 1996 session are incorporated into the corresponding
sections of chapter 302A.

Pursuant to §23G-15(1), the revisor has omitted all reserved
section numbers and renumbered the remaining sections of this chapter as
enacted by L 1996, c 89.

Hawaii broadband task force (repealed July 1, 2009). L Sp
2007, c 2.

Human resource management model for Waianae complex schools
(pilot project). L 2007, c 268.

Kauai community college--Hawaii excellence through science
and technology academy pilot program (reports through 2010 legislature). L
2007, c 111, §§7 to 10.

Interstate compact on educational opportunity for military
children, see chapter 311D.

Cross References

Building permit requirements for new developments in school
impact districts, see §46-142.5.

Impact fees for public highways, see §§364-121 to 127.

Department of education; organization and functions,
generally, see §26-12. See also Const. Art. X.

Departmental data sharing (improving educational and
workforce outcomes), see §27-7.

Employment of retirants, see §88-9.

Hawaii agriculture workforce advisory board, see §371-19.

Hawaii farm to school program, see §141-11.

Interstate compact on educational opportunity for military
children, see chapter 311D.

Medical marijuana patient and caregiver protections, see
§329-125.5.

Law Journals and Reviews

Regression by Progression: Unleveling the Classroom Playing
Field Through Cosmetic Neurology. 33 UH L. Rev. 193 (2010).

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next